Utah statutes.
75-7-515.   Claims not due and contingent or unliquidated claims.
(1)  If a claim which will become due at a future time or a contingent or
unliquidated claim becomes due or certain before the distribution of the trust
estate, and if the claim has been allowed or established by a proceeding, it
shall be paid in the same manner as presently due and absolute claims of the
same class.
(2)  In other cases the trustee, or, on petition of the trustee or the
claimant in a special proceeding for that purpose, the court, may provide for
payment as follows:
(a)  if the claimant consents, he may be paid the present or agreed value of
the claim, taking any uncertainty into account; or
(b)  arrangement for future payment, or possible payment, on the happening of
the contingency or on liquidation may be made by creating a trust, giving a
mortgage, obtaining a bond or security from a beneficiary, or otherwise.
